dev/apertium-kur.kur.lexc
LEXICON VerbCompound_rû

rû@D.PREF@:rû@D.PREF@ CompoundStems_rû ;
rû@P.PREF.di@:rûdi%{PREF%}@P.PREF.di@ CompoundStems_rû ;
rû@P.PREF.na@:rûna%{PREF%}@P.PREF.na@ CompoundStems_rû ;
rû@P.PREF.ne@:rûne%{PREF%}@P.PREF.ne@ CompoundStems_rû ;
rû@P.PREF.nedi@:rûnedi%{PREF%}@P.PREF.nedi@ CompoundStems_rû ; 

!! When the bí- prefix is omitted, the absence of a modal
!! modal prefix identifies the rûrb as subjunctirû, as in 
!! rû-xwarin (rû-xw-) ‘to drink’

rû@P.PREF.bi@:rû%{PREF%}@P.PREF.bi@ CompoundStems_rû ; 

LEXICON VerbCompound_ra

ra@D.PREF@:ra@D.PREF@ CompoundStems_ra ;
ra@P.PREF.di@:radi%{PREF%}@P.PREF.di@ CompoundStems_ra ;
ra@P.PREF.na@:rana%{PREF%}@P.PREF.na@ CompoundStems_ra ;
ra@P.PREF.ne@:rane%{PREF%}@P.PREF.ne@ CompoundStems_ra ;
ra@P.PREF.nedi@:ranedi%{PREF%}@P.PREF.nedi@ CompoundStems_ra ; 

ra@P.PREF.bi@:ra%{PREF%}@P.PREF.bi@ CompoundStems_ra ; 

LEXICON VerbCompound_hil

hil@D.PREF@:hil@D.PREF@ CompoundStems_hil ;
hil@P.PREF.di@:hildi%{PREF%}@P.PREF.di@ CompoundStems_hil ;
hil@P.PREF.na@:hilna%{PREF%}@P.PREF.na@ CompoundStems_hil ;
hil@P.PREF.ne@:hilne%{PREF%}@P.PREF.ne@ CompoundStems_hil ;
hil@P.PREF.nedi@:hilnedi%{PREF%}@P.PREF.nedi@ CompoundStems_hil ; 

hil@P.PREF.bi@:hil%{PREF%}@P.PREF.bi@ CompoundStems_hil ; 

LEXICON CompoundStems_ve 

xwar:xw Accidents_PresStem_in ; ! lm="vexwarin" :: "to drink"
xwar:xwar Accidents_PastStem_in ; ! lm="vexwarin" :: "to drink"

kir:k Accidents_PresStem_in ; ! lm="vekirin" :: "to open"
kir:kir Accidents_PastStem_in ; ! lm="vekirin" :: "to open"

got:bêj Accidents_PresStem_in ; ! lm="vegotin" :: "to report"
got:got Accidents_PastStem_in ; ! lm="vegotin" :: "to report"

LEXICON CompoundStems_ra

bûn:b Accidents_PresStem_ûn  ; ! lm="rabûn" :: "to get up" 
bûn:b Accidents_PastStem_ûn; ! lm="rabûn" :: "to get up" 

ket:kev Accidents_PresStem_in  ; ! lm="raketin" :: "to sleep" 
ket:ket Accidents_PastStem_in  ; ! lm="raketin" :: "to sleep" 

kir:k Accidents_PresStem_in  ; ! lm="rakirin" :: "to lift up" 
kir:kir Accidents_PastStem_in  ; ! lm="rakirin" :: "to lift up" 

LEXICON CompoundStems_hil

!hilat:hilê; ! lm="hilat" :: "to get up" :: hil-ê- / hil-hat-
!dan:d ; ! lm="hildan" :: "to lift"

bijart:bijêr Accidents_PresStem_in ; ! lm="hilbijartin" :: "to choose" 
bijart:bijart Accidents_PastStem_in ; ! lm="hilbijartin" :: "to choose" 

LEXICON CompoundStems_rû

nişt:nê Accidents_PresStem_in ; ! lm="rûniştin" :: "to sit down"
nişt:nişt Accidents_PastStem_in ; ! lm="rûniştin" :: "to sit down"

!behs% kir:behs% kir ; ! lm="behs kirin" :: "to discuss"
!alîkarî% kir:alîkarî% kir ; ! lm="alîkarî kirin" :: "to help"

LEXICON Accidents_PresStem_ûn

ûn%<v%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez diçim
ûn%<v%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez biçim
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.na@:@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez naçim
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez neçim
ûn%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.bi@:e@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! biçe
ûn%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.bi@:in@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! biçin
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.ne@:e@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! neke
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.ne@:in@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! nekin

LEXICON Accidents_PastStem_ûn

ûn%<v%>%<inf%>@D.PREF@:n@D.PREF@ # ; ! çûn
ûn%<v%>%<inf%>%<obl%>@D.PREF@:na@D.PREF@ # ; ! çûna
ûn%<v%>%<pp%>@D.PREF@:%{VSUFP%}î@D.PREF@ # ; ! çûnî

ûn%<v%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez çûme
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez neçûme

ûn%<v%>%<perf%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPast ; ! ez çûbûm
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPast ; ! ez neçûbûm
ûn%<v%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.bi@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.bi@ BûnPrs ; ! ez biçûbim
!! the bí- subjunctive prefix may be omitted for stylisic reasons
ûn%<v%>%<pis%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPrs ; ! ez biçûbim ^LR^
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPrs ; ! ez neçûbim

ûn%<v%>%<past%>%<cond%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixesIrrealis ; ! ez biçûma

ûn%<v%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez çûm
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez neçûm
ûn%<v%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.di@:@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez diçûm
ûn%<v%>%<neg%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.nedi@:@R.PREF.nedi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nediçûm

LEXICON Accidents_PresStem_in

in%<v%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez dikim
in%<v%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez bikim
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.na@:@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nakim
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nekim
in%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.bi@:e@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! bike
in%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.bi@:in@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! bikin
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.ne@:e@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! neke
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.ne@:in@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! nekin

LEXICON Accidents_PastStem_in

in%<v%>%<inf%>@D.PREF@:in@D.PREF@ # ; ! kirin
in%<v%>%<inf%>%<obl%>@D.PREF@:na@D.PREF@ # ; ! kirina
in%<v%>%<pp%>@D.PREF@:%{VSUFP%}î@D.PREF@ # ; ! kirî

in%<v%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez kirime 
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<pres%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixesPerfect ; ! ez nekirime

in%<v%>%<perf%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPast ; ! ez kiribûm 
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<perf%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPast ; ! ez nekiribûm
in%<v%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.bi@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.bi@ BûnPrs ; ! ez bikiribim 
!! the bí- subjunctive prefix may be omitted for stylisic reasons
in%<v%>%<pis%>@D.PREF@:i%{IEPH%}@D.PREF@ BûnPrs ; ! ez kiribim ^LR^
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<pis%>@R.PREF.ne@:i%{IEPH%}@R.PREF.ne@ BûnPrs ; ! ez nekiribim

in%<v%>%<past%>%<cond%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixesIrrealis ; ! ez bikirama

in%<v%>%<past%>@D.PREF@:@D.PREF@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez kirim
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<past%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nekirim
in%<v%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.di@:@R.PREF.di@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez dikirim
in%<v%>%<neg%>%<pii%>@R.PREF.nedi@:@R.PREF.nedi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nedikirim

LEXICON Accidents_PresStem_în

în%<v%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.di@@D.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez dinivîsim 
în%<v%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.bi@:@R.PREF.bi@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez binivîsim
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<pri%>@R.PREF.na@:@R.PREF.na@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nanivîsim
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<prs%>@R.PREF.ne@:@R.PREF.ne@ PersonalSuffixes ; ! ez nenivîsim
în%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.bi@:e@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! binivîse
în%<v%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.bi@:in@R.PREF.bi@ # ; ! binivîsin
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>@R.PREF.ne@:e@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! nenivîse
în%<v%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>@R.PREF.ne@:in@R.PREF.ne@ # ; ! nenivîsin

LEXICON VerbStems 
ç:ç Accidents_PresStem_ûn  ; ! lm="çûn" :: "to go"
ç:çû Accidents_PastStem_ûn ; ! lm="çûn" :: "to go"
şust:şo Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="şustin" :: "to wash"
şust:şust Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="şustin" :: "to wash"
axaft:axiv Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="axaftin" :: "to speak"
axaft:axaft Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="axaftin" :: "to speak"
êşand:êşîn Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="êşandin" :: "to hurt"
êşand:êşand Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="êşandin" :: "to hurt"
parast:parast Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="parastin" :: "to protect"
parast:parast Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="parastin" :: "to protect"
firot:firoş Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="firotin" :: "to sell" 
firot:firot Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="firotin" :: "to sell" 
bîst:bîst Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="bîstin" :: "to hear"
bîst:bîst Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="bîstin" :: "to hear"
hinart:hinart Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="hinartin" :: "to send"
hinart:hinart Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="hinartin" :: "to send"
kir:k Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="kirin" :: "to do"
kir:kir Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="kirin" :: "to do"
mîst:mîst Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="mîstin" :: "to urinate"
mîst:mîst Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="mîstin" :: "to urinate"
rûnişt:rûnişt Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="rûniştin" :: "to sit"
rûnişt:rûnişt Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="rûniştin" :: "to sit"
xwar:xw Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="xwarin" :: "to eat"
xwar:xwar Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="xwarin" :: "to eat"
xwend:xwend Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="xwendin" :: "to read"
xwend:xwend Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="xwendin" :: "to read"
şand:şand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="şandin" :: "to send"
şand:şand Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="şandin" :: "to send"
ket:kev Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="ketin" :: "to fall"
ket:ket Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="ketin" :: "to fall"
çand:çîn Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="çandin" :: ""
çand:çand Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="çandin" :: ""
azirand:azirîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="azirandin" :: "to incite"
azirand:azirand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="azirandin" :: "to incite"
belişand:belişîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="belişandin" :: "to incite"
belişand:belişand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="belişandin" :: "to incite"
dabiland:dabilîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="dabilandin" :: "to swallow"
dabiland:dabiland Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="dabilandin" :: "to swallow"
fetisand:fetisîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="fetisandin" :: "to choke"
fetisand:fetisand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="fetisandin" :: "to choke"
mirand:mirîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="mirandin" :: "to cause to die"
mirand:mirand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="mirandin" :: "to cause to die"
nivîsand:nivîsîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="nivîsandin" :: "to write"
nivîsand:nivîsand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="nivîsandin" :: "to write"
pesinand:pesinîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="pesinandin" :: "to pray"
pesinand:pesinand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="pesinandin" :: "to pray"
qedand:qedîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="qedandin" :: "to finish"
qedand:qedand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="qedandin" :: "to finish"
taşand:taşîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="taşandin" :: "to educate"
taşand:taşand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="taşandin" :: "to educate"
weşand:weşîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="weşandin" :: "to publish"
weşand:weşand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="weşandin" :: "to publish"
êşand:êşîn Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="êşandin" :: "to hurt"
êşand:êşand Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="êşandin" :: "to hurt"
xwest:xwaz Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="xwestin" :: "to want"
xwest:xwest Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="xwestin" :: "to want"
dît:bîn Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="dîtin" :: "to see"
dît:dît Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="dîtin" :: "to see"
got:bêj Accidents_PresStem_in ; !lm="gotin" :: "to say"
got:got Accidents_PastStem_in ; !lm="gotin" :: "to say"
nivîs:nivîs Accidents_PresStem_în ; !lm="nivîsîn" :: "to write"
tirs:tirs Accidents_PresStem_în ; !lm="tirsîn" :: "to fear"
kir:kir Accidents_PresStem_în ; !lm="kirîn" :: "to bring"
ewt:ew Accidents_PresStem_în ; !lm="ewtîn" :: "to bark"
